District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.11

OCME reporting requirement.

In the annual report filed pursuant to § 5-1412(d), the Chief Medical Examiner shall include the number of toxicology samples of sexual assault victims received from MPD and the number of toxicology samples of sexual assault victims processed by the OCME, including the time it took for each toxicology sample to be processed.

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 211, 61 DCR 5913

History